Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.040

Declaration of candidacy—Electronic filing.

A candidate may file a declaration of candidacy for an office by electronic means on a system specifically designed and authorized by a filing officer to accept filings.

(1) Filings that are received electronically must capture all information specified in RCW 29A.24.031 (1) through (4).

(2) Electronic filing may begin at 8:00 a.m. the first day of the filing period and continue through 5:00 p.m. the last day of the filing period.

[ 2023 c 394 s 2; 2011 c 349 s 6; 2006 c 344 s 5; 2003 c 111 s 604. Prior: 2002 c 140 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.15.044.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Implementation—2002 c 140: "The secretary of state may take the necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date." [ 2002 c 140 s 5.]

Captions not law—2002 c 140: "Section captions used in this act are not part of the law." [ 2002 c 140 s 6.]